Maryland, session 2025, SB0180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0180*

SENATE BILL 180
5–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Permit” means a permit issued by the Secretary to carry, wear, or transport
a handgun.
5–304.
(b) (1) Subject to subsections (c) and (d) of this section, the Secretary may
charge a nonrefundable fee payable when an application is filed for a permit.
(d) The Secretary may not charge a fee under subsection (b) of this section to:
(2) a retired law enforcement officer of the State or a county or municipal
corporation of the State.
5–309.
(a) Except as provided in [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (d) AND (E) of this section,
a permit expires on the last day of the holder’s birth month following 2 years after the date
the permit is issued.
(b) [Subject] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION
AND SUBJECT to subsection (c) of this section, a permit may be renewed for successive
periods of 3 years each if, at the time of an application for renewal, the applicant possesses
the qualifications for the issuance of a permit and pays the renewal fee stated in this
subtitle.
(c) A person who applies for a renewal of a permit is not required to be
fingerprinted unless the Secretary requires a set of the person’s fingerprints to resolve a
question of the person’s identity.
(d) The Secretary may establish an alternative expiration date for a permit to
coincide with the expiration of a license, certification, or commission for:
(1) a private detective under Title 13 of the Business Occupations and
Professions Article;
(2) a security guard under Title 19 of the Business Occupations and
Professions Article; or
(3) a special police officer under § 3–306 of this article.
(E) A PERMIT ISSUED TO A RETIRED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO
RETIRED IN GOOD STANDING FROM SERVICE WITH A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY

SENATE BILL 180 3
OF THE STATE OR A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION OF THE STATE:
(1) EXPIRES ON THE LAST DAY OF THE HOLDER’S BIRTH MONTH
FOLLOWING 5 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE PERMIT IS ISSUED; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, MAY BE RENEWED
FOR SUCCESSIVE PERIODS OF 5 YEARS EACH IF, AT THE TIME OF AN APPLICATION
FOR RENEWAL, THE APPLICANT POSSESSES THE QUALIFICATIONS FOR THE
ISSUANCE OF A PERMIT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.